Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4305
Law enforcement agencies, prosecuting attorneys, and Office of Probation Administration; duties.

On or before July 1, 2005, all law enforcement agencies, prosecuting attorneys, and the Office of Probation Administration shall develop, adopt, promulgate, and implement written policies and procedures regarding crimes between intimate partners as defined in section 28-323.

Laws 2004, LB 613, § 11.